North Dakota, session 69, HB1603.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY - NATIVE AMERICAN GRAVE
PROTECTION AND REPATRIATION COMPLIANCE.
1. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, the sum of $500,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to
the state historical society for the purpose of providing compliance with the federal Native
American Graves Protection and Repatriation Act, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
and ending June 30, 2027.
2. The state historical society shall use the funds provided under this section to establish a
compliance committee consisting of tribal historic preservation officers or their designees from
each North Dakota tribe with an agreement pursuant to chapter 54-40.2. The committee must
consist of representatives from the state historical society, Indian affairs commission, and the
attorney general's office. Each tribe participating on the committee shall provide matching
funds of up to $100,000 for committee efforts. All funds received for compliance efforts under
this section must be placed into a separate account with oversight by the office of
management and budget.
3. The committee must identify and prioritize compliance efforts for the repatriation of culturally
significant human remains, funerary objects, sacred objects, and objects of cultural patrimony,
including funding for staffing, training, and consultation with the tribal historic preservation
offices. The compliance committee shall develop policies to facilitate meetings, grant usage,
training, consultation, compliance timelines, training, and documentation requirements that
directly address the repatriation of culturally significant items to North Dakota tribal nations.
4. The appropriation provided in this section does not authorize any new scientific study of
Native American ancestral remains or burial property, as outlined in the federal Native
American Graves Protection and Repatriation Act, nor may the funds be appropriated for such
studies.

H. B. NO. 1603 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1603.
House Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 0 Absent 6
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State